test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_hoppee_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hoppee - ok : # Noun 'borg' - 
     hoppee+N+Sg+Nom: hoppee
     hoppee+N+Sg+Gen: hoppeen
     hoppee+N+Sg+Par: hoppeeta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Tra: hoppeeksi
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abe: hoppeetta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ine: hoppeessa
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ela: hoppeesta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ill: hoppeesseen
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ade: hoppeela
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abl: hoppeelta
     hoppee+N+Sg+All: hoppeele
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ess: hoppeena
     hoppee+N+Pl+Nom: hoppeet
     hoppee+N+Pl+Gen: hoppeitten
     hoppee+N+Pl+Par: hoppeita
     hoppee+N+Pl+Tra: hoppeiksi
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abe: hoppeitta
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ine: hoppeissa
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ela: hoppeista
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ill: hoppeissiin
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ade: hoppeila
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abl: hoppeilta
     hoppee+N+Pl+All: hoppeile
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ess: hoppeina
     hoppee+N+Pl+Com: hoppeine
